Wyoming, session 2025, HB0339.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-25-116 is created to read:

22-25-116. Regulation by homeowners' associations of
display of campaign signs.

HB0339

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0559
(a) As used in this section, "homeowners'
association" means any incorporated or unincorporated
association that is owned by or whose members consist
primarily of the owners of property governed by an
enforceable legal document through which the owners, or the
board of directors or similar governing body, manage or
regulate a residential subdivision, planned unit
development, condominium or townhouse development,
cooperative, mobile home association, nonprofit land trust
or similar planned residential development.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by this section, no
homeowners' association shall prohibit the indoor or
outdoor display of a campaign sign, including any flag,
advertising a candidate for nomination or election to
public office or a clearly identified ballot proposition
for an election.

(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a
homeowners' association from establishing regulations that
are in accordance with the homeowners' association's bylaws
or other governing document for campaign signs that:

HB0339

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0559
(i) Require a campaign sign posted outdoors to
be ground-mounted or attached to a fence on the homeowners'
association member's property;

(ii) Limit a property owner to displaying not
more than one (1) sign for each candidate or ballot
proposition;

(iii) Are displayed earlier than ninety (90)
days before the date of the primary election;

(iv) Are displayed later than thirty (30) days
after the date of the general election;

(v) Are attached in any way to plant material, a
traffic control device, a light, a trailer or a vehicle;

(vi) Include the painting of architectural
surfaces;

(vii) Threaten public health or safety;

HB0339

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0559
(viii) Are larger than four (4) feet by six (6)
feet;

(ix) Violate a law;

(x) Contain language, graphics or any display
that would be obscene pursuant to W.S. 6-4-301(a)(iii); or

(xi) Are accompanied by music or other sounds or
by streamers or are otherwise distracting to motorists.

(d) A homeowners' association may request removal of
a campaign sign in accordance with the association's bylaws
or governing document that is displayed in violation of a
regulation allowed by this section.

Section 2. W.S. 22-26-112(a)(ix) is amended to read:

22-26-112. Misdemeanor offenses generally.

(a) Unless a different penalty is specifically
provided in this code, the following acts, if knowingly and
willfully committed, are misdemeanor offenses punishable by
HB0339

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0559
not more than six (6) months in a county jail or a fine of
not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both:

(ix) Violating W.S. 22-25-101 through 22-25-115
22-25-116;

Section 3. This act shall apply to any homeowners'
association created or creating new legal requirements with
owners of property within the association on or after July
1, 2025.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0339